Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
NATIONAL PARKS

§184-21 Acquisition and conveyance of lands
for National Parks. Those provisions of various Acts of Congress
authorizing the acquisition of private lands for purposes of the Hawaii
National Park and City of Refuge National Historical Park by exchanges or
otherwise, such exchanges not to be limited by restrictions of the land laws of
the State of Hawaii, or authorizing the governor of Hawaii to acquire and
convey to the United States lands and interests in lands, which provisions are
"Territorial laws" pursuant to section 15 of Public Law 86-3 of the
86th Congress, are hereby ratified and adopted as laws of the State of Hawaii
without any termination or expiration date. [L Sp 1959 1st, c 6, §1; HRS
§184-21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next